apertium-hun.hun.dix
    <!-- ny nny -->
    <pardef n="lá/ny__n">
        <e><p><l>ny</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nynak</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nyt</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nnyal</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nyban</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nyhoz</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nyba</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nynál</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nyon</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>nya</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="px3ss"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nyának</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="px3ss"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nyára</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="px3ss"/><s n="sg"/><s n="sub"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nyuk</l><r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <!-- shortening -->
    <pardef n="poh/ár__n">
        <e><p><l>ár</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>árnak</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>arat</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>árral</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>árban</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>árhoz</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>árba</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>árnál</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>áron</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>ara</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="px3ss"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>arának</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="px3ss"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>arára</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="px3ss"/><s n="sg"/><s n="sub"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aruk</l><r>ár<s n="n"/><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="k/éz__n">
        <e><p><l>éz</l><r>éz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ezet</l><r>éz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ézzel</l><r>éz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ézben</l><r>éz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ézhez</l><r>éz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ézbe</l><r>éz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>éznél</l><r>éz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ézen</l><r>éz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>ezét</l><r>éz<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="foo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="v/íz__n">
        <e><p><l>íz</l><r>íz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>izet</l><r>íz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ízzel</l><r>íz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ízben</l><r>íz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ízhez</l><r>íz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ízbe</l><r>íz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>íznél</l><r>íz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ízen</l><r>íz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Proper nouns -->

    <pardef n="case-prop">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t</l><r><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>val</l><r><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ban</l><r><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ba</l><r><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="Jancsi__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="case-prop"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Mari__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="case-prop"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adjectives -->

    <!-- incomparable "adjective" -->
    <pardef n="éves__adj">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hideg__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ebb</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nagy__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>obb</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="boldog__adj">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ok</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>abb</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ki/csi__adj">
      <e><p><l>csi</l><r>csi<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sebb</l><r>csi<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="szé/p__adj">
      <e><p><l>p</l><r>p<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bb</l><r>p<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="j/ó__adj">
      <e><p><l>ó</l><r>ó<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>obb</l><r>ó<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->

    <pardef n="hol__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/nagyon__adv">
      <e><p><l>nagyon</l><r>nagyon<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jobban</l><r>nagyon<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>legjobban</l><r>nagyon<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="j/ól__adv">
      <e><p><l>ól</l><r>ól<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>obban</l><r>ól<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lassa/n__adv">
      <e><p><l>n</l><r>n<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bban</l><r>n<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tegnap__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->

    <!-- regular a o u -->
    <pardef n="imád__vblex">
        <e><p><l>ni</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sz</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>unk</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>od</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>juk</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>átok</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ák</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="def"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="arány"><i>ará</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ásvány"><i>ásvá</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bálvány"><i>bálvá</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bárány"><i>bárá</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bizonyítvány"><i>bizonyítvá</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bogár"><i>bog</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="borospohár"><i>borospoh</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cickány"><i>cická</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cigány"><i>cigá</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csákány"><i>csáká</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csalogány"><i>csalogá</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csapatkapitány"><i>csapatkapitá</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csatolmány"><i>csatolmá</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csótány"><i>csótá</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kéz"><i>k</i><par n="k/éz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kislány"><i>kislá</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lány"><i>lá</i><par n="lá/ny__n"/></e>
    <e lm="madár"><i>mad</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pohár"><i>poh</i><par n="poh/ár__n"/></e>
    <e lm="víz"><i>v</i><par n="v/íz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Jancsi"><i>Jancsi</i><par n="Jancsi__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mari"><i>Mari</i><par n="Mari__np"/></e>
    <e lm="boldog"><i>boldog</i><par n="boldog__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="figyelmes"><i>figyelmes</i><par n="hideg__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hideg"><i>hideg</i><par n="hideg__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jó"><i>j</i><par n="j/ó__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kicsi"><i>ki</i><par n="ki/csi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kis"><i>kis</i><par n="hideg__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="közel"><i>közel</i><par n="hideg__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="más"><i>más</i><par n="boldog__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="meleg"><i>meleg</i><par n="hideg__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nagy"><i>nagy</i><par n="nagy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="szép"><i>szé</i><par n="szé/p__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vén"><i>vén</i><par n="hideg__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ötéves"><i>ötéves</i><par n="éves__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hatéves"><i>hatéves</i><par n="éves__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gyorsan"><i>gyorsa</i><par n="lassa/n__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="jól"><i>j</i><par n="j/ól__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="lassan"><i>lassa</i><par n="lassa/n__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nagyon"><i></i><par n="/nagyon__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aztán"><i>aztán</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="csak"><i>csak</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="együtt"><i>együtt</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="is"><i>is</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ideje"><i>ideje</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ma"><i>ma</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="meg"><i>megint</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mindenhová"><i>mindenhová</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mindketten"><i>mindketten</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nem"><i>nem</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="persze"><i>persze</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="valószínűleg"><i>valószínűleg</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="soha"><i>soha</i><par n="tegnap__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hol"><i>hol</i><par n="hol__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hova"><i>hova</i><par n="hol__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hová"><i>hová</i><par n="hol__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="miért"><i>miért</i><par n="hol__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mit"><i>mit</i><par n="hol__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="merre"><i>merre</i><par n="hol__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mikor"><i>mikor</i><par n="hol__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="árkol"><p><l>árkol</l><r>árkol</r></p><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="buherál"><p><l>buherál</l><r>buherál</r></p><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="deformál"><p><l>deformál</l><r>deformál</r></p><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ellensúlyoz"><p><l>ellensúlyoz</l><r>ellensúlyoz</r></p><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fújdogál"><p><l>fújdogál</l><r>fújdogál</r></p><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="harácsol"><p><l>harácsol</l><r>harácsol</r></p><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="interpellál"><p><l>interpellál</l><r>interpellál</r></p><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kipuskáz"><p><l>kipuskáz</l><r>kipuskáz</r></p><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kukkol"><p><l>kukkol</l><r>kukkol</r></p><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="manifesztál"><p><l>manifesztál</l><r>manifesztál</r></p><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="perforál"><p><l>perforál</l><r>perforál</r></p><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sarkantyúz"><p><l>sarkantyúz</l><r>sarkantyúz</r></p><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tapsol"><p><l>tapsol</l><r>tapsol</r></p><par n="imád__vblex"/></e>
